02_Morphology/grn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
%>                   ! Frontera de morfema
%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<gen%>              ! Genitivo
%<loc%>              ! Locativo
%<fut%>              ! futuro
%<der_kue%>          ! Abstraction
%{m%}                ! 
%<plu%>              ! Pluralidad
%<sin%>              ! Singularidad
%{ng%}               ! 

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON SUBST

%<der_kue%>:%>%{ng%}ue NUM ;

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: NUM ; ! ""
%<gen%>:%>gui NUM ; ! "de"
%<loc%>:%>%{m%}e NUM ; ! "a, en"
%<fut%>:%>rã NUM ;

LEXICON NUM

%<plu%>:%>%{ng%}uéra #;
%<sin%>: #;

LEXICON Nouns

óga:óga N ; ! "casa"
irũ:irũ N ; ! "amigo"
apyka:apyka N ; ! "silla"
ava:ava N ; ! "raza, gente"
tembiasa:tembiasa N ; ! "experiencia"
mbarakaja:mbarakaja N ; ! "gato"
jagua:jagua N ; ! "perro"
mitã:mitã N ; ! "niño"
avatisoka:avatisoka N ; ! "mano"
okẽ:okẽ N ; ! "door"
para:para N ; ! "mar"
resa:resa N ; ! "ojo"
pira:pira N ; ! "pez"
rata:rata N ; ! "fuego"
kuña:kuña N ; ! "mujer"
tatatĩ:tatatĩ N ; ! "fumo"
rete:rete N ; ! "cuerpo"
mboka:mboka N ; ! "arma"
kuarepotitĩ:kuarepotitĩ N ; ! "plato"
aguara:aguara N ; ! "zorro"
arateĩ:arateĩ N ; ! "domingo"
